Hawaii statutes.
[§480E-13]
Requirements for attorneys licensed in Hawaii. An attorney licensed in the
State engaged in the practice of law who performs or provides, or attempts to
perform or provide, or who arranges for others to perform or provide, or who
assists others to perform or provide, or who makes any solicitation,
representation, or offer to perform or provide, any mortgage assistance relief
service shall:

(1) Execute a written contract that identifies each
mortgage assistance relief service to be provided;

(2) Maintain a client trust account that complies
with all applicable state laws and rules;

(3) Deposit into the attorney's client trust account
all moneys received by or on behalf of the consumer to be provided with any
mortgage assistance relief service; and

(4) Keep and maintain all moneys received in deposit
in the client trust account until such time as the attorney has fully performed
each service the attorney contracted to perform or represented would be
performed. [L 2016, c 142, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next